Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.270

Application of administrative procedure act.

The proceedings for revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew or accept an application for renewal of an escrow agent's registration or escrow officer license, and any appeal therefrom or review thereof shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 17; 1971 ex.s. c 245 s 14.]